Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 6 Uniform Divorce Recognition Act

15-6-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Divorce Recognition Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2268, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

15-6-1

.

15-6-2.
Ex parte divorce in another state between parties resident in this state.

A divorce from the bonds of matrimony obtained in another jurisdiction in ex parte proceedings shall be of no force or effect in this state, if both parties to the marriage were domiciled in this state at the time that the proceeding for the divorce was commenced.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2268, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-6-2

.

15-6-3.
Prima facie evidence of continued domicile in state.

Proof that a person obtaining a divorce from the bonds of matrimony in another jurisdiction: (1) was domiciled in this state within twelve (12) months prior to the commencement of the proceeding for divorce, and resumed residence in this state within eighteen (18) months after the date of his or her departure from this state, or (2) at all times after his or her departure from this state and until his or her return maintained a place of residence within this state, shall be prima facie evidence that the person was domiciled in this state when the divorce proceeding was commenced.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2268, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

15-6-3

.

15-6-4.
Uniformity of construction.

This chapter shall be interpreted and construed so as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2268, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

15-6-4

.